Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-613
Council members; qualifications; forfeiture of office; grounds.

Members of the council shall be residents and registered voters of the city and shall hold no other employment with the city. Any council member who ceases to possess any of the qualifications required by this section or who has been convicted of a crime while in office shall forthwith forfeit such office.

Laws 1917, c. 208, § 14, p. 500;

C.S.1922, § 4551;

C.S.1929, § 19-614;

R.S.1943, § 19-613;

Laws 1971, LB 494, § 6;

Laws 1975, LB 453, § 2;

Laws 1977, LB 50, § 1;

Laws 1979, LB 80, § 55;

Laws 1983, LB 370, § 9;

Laws 1990, LB 931, § 4;

Laws 1991, LB 12, § 3;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 519.

Vacancies, see sections 32-568 and 32-569.